test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-nouns1-Oct_2016_gt-norm.yaml
  Nouns:
    aasta+N+Pl+Abe: aastateta
    aasta+N+Pl+Abl: aastatelt
    aasta+N+Pl+Abl+Use/Rare: aastailt
    aasta+N+Pl+Ade: aastatel
    aasta+N+Pl+Ade+Use/Rare: aastail
    aasta+N+Pl+All: aastatele
    aasta+N+Pl+All+Use/Rare: aastaile
    aasta+N+Pl+Com: aastatega
    aasta+N+Pl+Ela: aastatest
    aasta+N+Pl+Ela+Use/Rare: aastaist
    aasta+N+Pl+Ess: aastatena
    aasta+N+Pl+Gen: aastate
    aasta+N+Pl+Ill: aastatesse
    aasta+N+Pl+Ill+Use/Rare: aastaisse
    aasta+N+Pl+Ine: aastates
    aasta+N+Pl+Ine+Use/Rare: aastais
    aasta+N+Pl+Nom: aastad
    aasta+N+Pl+Par: aastaid
    aasta+N+Pl+Tra: aastateks
    aasta+N+Pl+Tra+Use/Rare: aastaiks
    aasta+N+Pl+Trm: aastateni
    aasta+N+Sg+Abe: aastata
    aasta+N+Sg+Abl: aastalt
    aasta+N+Sg+Ade: aastal
    aasta+N+Sg+All: aastale
    aasta+N+Sg+Com: aastaga
    aasta+N+Sg+Ela: aastast
    aasta+N+Sg+Ess: aastana
    aasta+N+Sg+Gen: aasta
    aasta+N+Sg+Ill: aastasse
    aasta+N+Sg+Ine: aastas
    aasta+N+Sg+Nom: aasta
    aasta+N+Sg+Par: aastat
    aasta+N+Sg+Tra: aastaks
    aasta+N+Sg+Trm: aastani
    abt+N+Pl+Abe: abtideta
    abt+N+Pl+Abl: abtidelt
    abt+N+Pl+Ade: abtidel
    abt+N+Pl+All: abtidele
    abt+N+Pl+Com: abtidega
    abt+N+Pl+Ela: abtidest
    abt+N+Pl+Ess: abtidena
    abt+N+Pl+Gen: abtide
    abt+N+Pl+Ill: abtidesse
    abt+N+Pl+Ine: abtides
    abt+N+Pl+Nom: abtid
    abt+N+Pl+Par: abte
    abt+N+Pl+Par+Use/Rare: abtisid
    abt+N+Pl+Tra: abtideks
    abt+N+Pl+Trm: abtideni
    abt+N+Sg+Abe: abtita
    abt+N+Sg+Abl: abtilt
    abt+N+Sg+Ade: abtil
    abt+N+Sg+All: abtile
    abt+N+Sg+Com: abtiga
    abt+N+Sg+Ela: abtist
    abt+N+Sg+Ess: abtina
    abt+N+Sg+Gen: abti
    abt+N+Sg+Ill: abti
    abt+N+Sg+Ill+Use/Hyp: abtisse
    abt+N+Sg+Ine: abtis
    abt+N+Sg+Nom: abt
    abt+N+Sg+Par: abti
    abt+N+Sg+Tra: abtiks
    abt+N+Sg+Trm: abtini
    ader+N+Pl+Abe: atradeta
    ader+N+Pl+Abl: atradelt
    ader+N+Pl+Ade: atradel
    ader+N+Pl+All: atradele
    ader+N+Pl+Com: atradega
    ader+N+Pl+Ela: atradest
    ader+N+Pl+Ess: atradena
    ader+N+Pl+Gen: atrade
    ader+N+Pl+Ill: atradesse
    ader+N+Pl+Ine: atrades
    ader+N+Pl+Nom: adrad
    ader+N+Pl+Par: atrasid
    ader+N+Pl+Par+Use/Rare: atru
    ader+N+Pl+Tra: atradeks
    ader+N+Pl+Trm: atradeni
    ader+N+Sg+Abe: adrata
    ader+N+Sg+Abl: adralt
    ader+N+Sg+Ade: adral
    ader+N+Sg+All: adrale
    ader+N+Sg+Com: adraga
    ader+N+Sg+Ela: adrast
    ader+N+Sg+Ess: adrana
    ader+N+Sg+Gen: adra
    ader+N+Sg+Ill: atra
    ader+N+Sg+Ill+Use/Hyp: adrasse
    ader+N+Sg+Ine: adras
    ader+N+Sg+Nom: ader
    ader+N+Sg+Par: atra
    ader+N+Sg+Tra: adraks
    ader+N+Sg+Trm: adrani
    aed+N+Pl+Abe: aedadeta
    aed+N+Pl+Abl: aedadelt
    aed+N+Pl+Ade: aedadel
    aed+N+Pl+All: aedadele
    aed+N+Pl+Com: aedadega
    aed+N+Pl+Ela: aedadest
    aed+N+Pl+Ess: aedadena
    aed+N+Pl+Gen: aedade
    aed+N+Pl+Ill: aedadesse
    aed+N+Pl+Ine: aedades
    aed+N+Pl+Nom: aiad
    aed+N+Pl+Par: aedu
    aed+N+Pl+Par+Use/Rare: aedasid
    aed+N+Pl+Tra: aedadeks
    aed+N+Pl+Trm: aedadeni
    aed+N+Sg+Abe: aiata
    aed+N+Sg+Abl: aialt
    aed+N+Sg+Ade: aial
    aed+N+Sg+All: aiale
    aed+N+Sg+Com: aiaga
    aed+N+Sg+Ela: aiast
    aed+N+Sg+Ess: aiana
    aed+N+Sg+Gen: aia
    aed+N+Sg+Ill: aeda
    aed+N+Sg+Ill+Use/Hyp: aiasse
    aed+N+Sg+Ine: aias
    aed+N+Sg+Nom: aed
    aed+N+Sg+Par: aeda
    aed+N+Sg+Tra: aiaks
    aed+N+Sg+Trm: aiani
    aeg+N+Pl+Abe: aegadeta
    aeg+N+Pl+Abl: aegadelt
    aeg+N+Pl+Ade: aegadel
    aeg+N+Pl+All: aegadele
    aeg+N+Pl+Com: aegadega
    aeg+N+Pl+Ela: aegadest
    aeg+N+Pl+Ess: aegadena
    aeg+N+Pl+Gen: aegade
    aeg+N+Pl+Ill: aegadesse
    aeg+N+Pl+Ine: aegades
    aeg+N+Pl+Nom: ajad
    aeg+N+Pl+Par: aegu
    aeg+N+Pl+Par+Use/Rare: aegasid
    aeg+N+Pl+Tra: aegadeks
    aeg+N+Pl+Trm: aegadeni
    aeg+N+Sg+Abe: ajata
    aeg+N+Sg+Abl: ajalt
    aeg+N+Sg+Ade: ajal
    aeg+N+Sg+All: ajale
    aeg+N+Sg+Com: ajaga
    aeg+N+Sg+Ela: ajast
    aeg+N+Sg+Ess: ajana
    aeg+N+Sg+Gen: aja
    aeg+N+Sg+Ill: aega
    aeg+N+Sg+Ill+Use/Hyp: ajasse
    aeg+N+Sg+Ine: ajas
    aeg+N+Sg+Nom: aeg
    aeg+N+Sg+Par: aega
    aeg+N+Sg+Tra: ajaks
    aeg+N+Sg+Trm: ajani
    ahi+N+Pl+Abe: ahjudeta
    ahi+N+Pl+Abl: ahjudelt
    ahi+N+Pl+Ade: ahjudel
    ahi+N+Pl+All: ahjudele
    ahi+N+Pl+Com: ahjudega
    ahi+N+Pl+Ela: ahjudest
    ahi+N+Pl+Ess: ahjudena
    ahi+N+Pl+Gen: ahjude
    ahi+N+Pl+Ill: ahjudesse
    ahi+N+Pl+Ine: ahjudes
    ahi+N+Pl+Nom: ahjud
    ahi+N+Pl+Par: ahjusid
    ahi+N+Pl+Par+Use/Rare: ahje
    ahi+N+Pl+Tra: ahjudeks
    ahi+N+Pl+Trm: ahjudeni
    ahi+N+Sg+Abe: ahjuta
    ahi+N+Sg+Abl: ahjult
    ahi+N+Sg+Ade: ahjul
    ahi+N+Sg+All: ahjule
    ahi+N+Sg+Com: ahjuga
    ahi+N+Sg+Ela: ahjust
    ahi+N+Sg+Ess: ahjuna
    ahi+N+Sg+Gen: ahju
    ahi+N+Sg+Ill: ahju
    ahi+N+Sg+Ill+Use/Hyp: ahjusse
    ahi+N+Sg+Ine: ahjus
    ahi+N+Sg+Nom: ahi
    ahi+N+Sg+Par: ahju
    ahi+N+Sg+Tra: ahjuks
    ahi+N+Sg+Trm: ahjuni
    alimendid+N+Pl+Abe: alimentideta
    alimendid+N+Pl+Abl: alimentidelt
    alimendid+N+Pl+Ade: alimentidel
    alimendid+N+Pl+All: alimentidele
    alimendid+N+Pl+Com: alimentidega
    alimendid+N+Pl+Ela: alimentidest
    alimendid+N+Pl+Ess: alimentidena
    alimendid+N+Pl+Gen: alimentide
    alimendid+N+Pl+Ill: alimentidesse
    alimendid+N+Pl+Ine: alimentides
    alimendid+N+Pl+Nom: alimendid
    alimendid+N+Pl+Par: alimente
    alimendid+N+Pl+Par+Use/Rare: alimentisid
    alimendid+N+Pl+Tra: alimentideks
    alimendid+N+Pl+Trm: alimentideni
    argpüks+N+Pl+Abe: argpüksideta
    argpüks+N+Pl+Abe+Use/Rare: argpüksteta
    argpüks+N+Pl+Abl: argpüksidelt
    argpüks+N+Pl+Abl+Use/Rare: argpükstelt
    argpüks+N+Pl+Ade: argpüksidel
    argpüks+N+Pl+Ade+Use/Rare: argpükstel
    argpüks+N+Pl+All: argpüksidele
    argpüks+N+Pl+All+Use/Rare: argpükstele
    argpüks+N+Pl+Com: argpüksidega
    argpüks+N+Pl+Com+Use/Rare: argpükstega
    argpüks+N+Pl+Ela: argpüksidest
    argpüks+N+Pl+Ela+Use/Rare: argpükstest
    argpüks+N+Pl+Ess: argpüksidena
    argpüks+N+Pl+Ess+Use/Rare: argpükstena
    argpüks+N+Pl+Gen: argpükside
    argpüks+N+Pl+Gen+Use/Rare: argpükste
    argpüks+N+Pl+Ill: argpüksidesse
    argpüks+N+Pl+Ill+Use/Rare: argpükstesse
    argpüks+N+Pl+Ine: argpüksides
    argpüks+N+Pl+Ine+Use/Rare: argpükstes
    argpüks+N+Pl+Nom: argpüksid
    argpüks+N+Pl+Par: argpükse
    argpüks+N+Pl+Par+Use/Rare: argpüksisid
    argpüks+N+Pl+Tra: argpüksideks
    argpüks+N+Pl+Tra+Use/Rare: argpüksteks
    argpüks+N+Pl+Trm: argpüksideni
    argpüks+N+Pl+Trm+Use/Rare: argpüksteni
    argpüks+N+Sg+Abe: argpüksita
    argpüks+N+Sg+Abl: argpüksilt
    argpüks+N+Sg+Ade: argpüksil
    argpüks+N+Sg+All: argpüksile
    argpüks+N+Sg+Com: argpüksiga
    argpüks+N+Sg+Ela: argpüksist
    argpüks+N+Sg+Ess: argpüksina
    argpüks+N+Sg+Gen: argpüksi
    argpüks+N+Sg+Ill: argpüksi
    argpüks+N+Sg+Ill+Use/Hyp: argpüksisse
    argpüks+N+Sg+Ine: argpüksis
    argpüks+N+Sg+Nom: argpüks
    argpüks+N+Sg+Par: argpüksi
    argpüks+N+Sg+Tra: argpüksiks
    argpüks+N+Sg+Trm: argpüksini
    arter+N+Pl+Abe: arteriteta
    arter+N+Pl+Abl: arteritelt
    arter+N+Pl+Abl+Use/Rare: artereilt
    arter+N+Pl+Ade: arteritel
    arter+N+Pl+Ade+Use/Rare: artereil
    arter+N+Pl+All: arteritele
    arter+N+Pl+All+Use/Rare: artereile
    arter+N+Pl+Com: arteritega
    arter+N+Pl+Ela: arteritest
    arter+N+Pl+Ela+Use/Rare: artereist
    arter+N+Pl+Ess: arteritena
    arter+N+Pl+Gen: arterite
    arter+N+Pl+Ill: arteritesse
    arter+N+Pl+Ill+Use/Rare: artereisse
    arter+N+Pl+Ine: arterites
    arter+N+Pl+Ine+Use/Rare: artereis
    arter+N+Pl+Nom: arterid
    arter+N+Pl+Par: artereid
    arter+N+Pl+Tra: arteriteks
    arter+N+Pl+Tra+Use/Rare: artereiks
    arter+N+Pl+Trm: arteriteni
    arter+N+Sg+Abe: arterita
    arter+N+Sg+Abl: arterilt
    arter+N+Sg+Ade: arteril
    arter+N+Sg+All: arterile
    arter+N+Sg+Com: arteriga
    arter+N+Sg+Ela: arterist
    arter+N+Sg+Ess: arterina
    arter+N+Sg+Gen: arteri
    arter+N+Sg+Ill: arterisse
    arter+N+Sg+Ine: arteris
    arter+N+Sg+Nom: arter
    arter+N+Sg+Par: arterit
    arter+N+Sg+Tra: arteriks
    arter+N+Sg+Trm: arterini
    bakter+N+Pl+Abe: bakteriteta
    bakter+N+Pl+Abl: bakteritelt
    bakter+N+Pl+Abl+Use/Rare: baktereilt
    bakter+N+Pl+Ade: bakteritel
    bakter+N+Pl+Ade+Use/Rare: baktereil
    bakter+N+Pl+All: bakteritele
    bakter+N+Pl+All+Use/Rare: baktereile
    bakter+N+Pl+Com: bakteritega
    bakter+N+Pl+Ela: bakteritest
    bakter+N+Pl+Ela+Use/Rare: baktereist
    bakter+N+Pl+Ess: bakteritena
    bakter+N+Pl+Gen: bakterite
    bakter+N+Pl+Ill: bakteritesse
    bakter+N+Pl+Ill+Use/Rare: baktereisse
    bakter+N+Pl+Ine: bakterites
    bakter+N+Pl+Ine+Use/Rare: baktereis
    bakter+N+Pl+Nom: bakterid
    bakter+N+Pl+Par: baktereid
    bakter+N+Pl+Tra: bakteriteks
    bakter+N+Pl+Tra+Use/Rare: baktereiks
    bakter+N+Pl+Trm: bakteriteni
    bakter+N+Sg+Abe: bakterita
    bakter+N+Sg+Abl: bakterilt
    bakter+N+Sg+Ade: bakteril
    bakter+N+Sg+All: bakterile
    bakter+N+Sg+Com: bakteriga
    bakter+N+Sg+Ela: bakterist
    bakter+N+Sg+Ess: bakterina
    bakter+N+Sg+Gen: bakteri
    bakter+N+Sg+Ill: bakterisse
    bakter+N+Sg+Ine: bakteris
    bakter+N+Sg+Nom: bakter
    bakter+N+Sg+Par: bakterit
    bakter+N+Sg+Tra: bakteriks
    bakter+N+Sg+Trm: bakterini
    buss+N+Pl+Abe: bussideta
    buss+N+Pl+Abl: bussidelt
    buss+N+Pl+Ade: bussidel
    buss+N+Pl+All: bussidele
    buss+N+Pl+Com: bussidega
    buss+N+Pl+Ela: bussidest
    buss+N+Pl+Ess: bussidena
    buss+N+Pl+Gen: busside
    buss+N+Pl+Ill: bussidesse
    buss+N+Pl+Ine: bussides
    buss+N+Pl+Nom: bussid
    buss+N+Pl+Par: busse
    buss+N+Pl+Par+Use/Rare: bussisid
    buss+N+Pl+Tra: bussideks
    buss+N+Pl+Trm: bussideni
    buss+N+Sg+Abe: bussita
    buss+N+Sg+Abl: bussilt
    buss+N+Sg+Ade: bussil
    buss+N+Sg+All: bussile
    buss+N+Sg+Com: bussiga
    buss+N+Sg+Ela: bussist
    buss+N+Sg+Ess: bussina
    buss+N+Sg+Gen: bussi
    buss+N+Sg+Ill: bussi
    buss+N+Sg+Ill+Use/Hyp: bussisse
    buss+N+Sg+Ine: bussis
    buss+N+Sg+Nom: buss
    buss+N+Sg+Par: bussi
    buss+N+Sg+Tra: bussiks
    buss+N+Sg+Trm: bussini
    danaiid+N+Pl+Abe: danaiidideta
    danaiid+N+Pl+Abl: danaiididelt
    danaiid+N+Pl+Ade: danaiididel
    danaiid+N+Pl+All: danaiididele
    danaiid+N+Pl+Com: danaiididega
    danaiid+N+Pl+Ela: danaiididest
    danaiid+N+Pl+Ess: danaiididena
    danaiid+N+Pl+Gen: danaiidide
    danaiid+N+Pl+Ill: danaiididesse
    danaiid+N+Pl+Ine: danaiidides
    danaiid+N+Pl+Nom: danaiidid
    danaiid+N+Pl+Par: danaiide
    danaiid+N+Pl+Par+Use/Rare: danaiidisid
    danaiid+N+Pl+Tra: danaiidideks
    danaiid+N+Pl+Trm: danaiidideni
    danaiid+N+Sg+Abe: danaiidita
    danaiid+N+Sg+Abl: danaiidilt
    danaiid+N+Sg+Ade: danaiidil
    danaiid+N+Sg+All: danaiidile
    danaiid+N+Sg+Com: danaiidiga
    danaiid+N+Sg+Ela: danaiidist
    danaiid+N+Sg+Ess: danaiidina
    danaiid+N+Sg+Gen: danaiidi
    danaiid+N+Sg+Ill: danaiidi
    danaiid+N+Sg+Ill+Use/Hyp: danaiidisse
    danaiid+N+Sg+Ine: danaiidis
    danaiid+N+Sg+Nom: danaiid
    danaiid+N+Sg+Par: danaiidi
    danaiid+N+Sg+Tra: danaiidiks
    danaiid+N+Sg+Trm: danaiidini
    dušš+N+Pl+Abe: duššideta
    dušš+N+Pl+Abl: duššidelt
    dušš+N+Pl+Ade: duššidel
    dušš+N+Pl+All: duššidele
    dušš+N+Pl+Com: duššidega
    dušš+N+Pl+Ela: duššidest
    dušš+N+Pl+Ess: duššidena
    dušš+N+Pl+Gen: duššide
    dušš+N+Pl+Ill: duššidesse
    dušš+N+Pl+Ine: duššides
    dušš+N+Pl+Nom: dušid
    dušš+N+Pl+Par: dušše
    dušš+N+Pl+Par+Use/Rare: duššisid
    dušš+N+Pl+Tra: duššideks
    dušš+N+Pl+Trm: duššideni
    dušš+N+Sg+Abe: dušita
    dušš+N+Sg+Abl: dušilt
    dušš+N+Sg+Ade: dušil
    dušš+N+Sg+All: dušile
    dušš+N+Sg+Com: dušiga
    dušš+N+Sg+Ela: dušist
    dušš+N+Sg+Ess: dušina
    dušš+N+Sg+Gen: duši
    dušš+N+Sg+Ill: dušši
    dušš+N+Sg+Ill+Use/Hyp: dušisse
    dušš+N+Sg+Ine: dušis
    dušš+N+Sg+Nom: dušš
    dušš+N+Sg+Par: dušši
    dušš+N+Sg+Tra: dušiks
    dušš+N+Sg+Trm: dušini
